Washington statutes.
RCW 43.114.030

Membership—Terms—Vacancies—Expenses—Quorum.

(1) The commission consists of fifteen members appointed by the governor.

(2) The governor shall consider nominations for membership based upon maintaining a balanced and diverse distribution of race and ethnic, geographic, gender identity, sexual orientation, age, socioeconomic status, and occupational representation, where practicable.

(3) All commission members serve at the pleasure of the governor, but in no case may any member serve more than three years without formal reappointment by the governor. Of the persons initially appointed by the governor to the commission, five must be appointed to serve one year, five to serve two years, and five to serve three years. Upon expiration of such terms, subsequent appointments are for three years. Any vacancies occurring in the membership of the commission must be filled for the remainder of the unexpired term in the same manner as the original appointments.

(4) Two members of the senate, one from each of the two major political parties, appointed by the president of the senate, and two members of the house of representatives, one from each of the two major political parties, appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives, who support the legislative intent of the commission shall serve as advisory members. The legislative advisory members are nonvoting members and are not eligible to serve as a chair of the commission. All legislative advisory members shall serve for a two-year term and the position of any legislative advisory member shall be deemed vacated whenever such member ceases to be a member of the house from which the member was appointed.

(5)(a) Nonlegislative members must be reimbursed for expenses incurred in the performance of their duties in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(b) Legislative members shall be reimbursed for expenses incurred in the performance of their duties in accordance with RCW 44.04.120.

(6) A simple majority of the commission's membership constitutes a quorum for the purpose of conducting business. Legislative advisory members are not included in determining a quorum.

[ 2019 c 395 s 4.]